Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1004
Assistance to the blind; additional qualifications required.

In order to qualify for assistance to the blind, an individual must, in addition to the requirements set forth in section 68-1002, have been determined to be blind by an examination by a physician skilled in diseases of the eye or by an optometrist.

Laws 1965, c. 395, § 4, p. 1265;

Laws 1977, LB 311, § 1.